Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.037

Disabled voter.

"Disabled voter" means any registered voter who qualifies for special parking privileges under RCW 46.19.010, or who is defined as blind under RCW 74.18.020, or who qualifies to require assistance with voting under RCW 29A.40.160.

[ 2011 c 10 s 5; 2010 c 161 s 1103; 2003 c 111 s 107. Prior: 1987 c 346 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.01.047.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.